Massachusetts, session 194th, H2726.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 140 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby 
amended by inserting after section 6B the following section:- 
Section 6C.  
(a) For the purposes of this section, “qualified accommodation” shall mean a hotel, motel, 
lodging house or bed and breakfast establishment, as defined in section 1 of chapter 64G, except 
for accommodations exempt from the room occupancy excise pursuant to section 2 of said 
chapter 64G. 
(b) Every licensed innholder operating a qualified accommodation shall establish a 
human trafficking recognition training program, and shall require every employee of such 
accommodation to participate in the training program. The training program shall be approved by 
the attorney general, and may be provided by organizations or providers approved by the 
attorney general pursuant to subsection (d). The training program may be developed by a federal, 

of 2 13 state or nonprofit organization, and may be incorporated as part of the innholder’s existing 
training programs. Human trafficking recognition training programs required pursuant to this 
section shall include, but shall not be limited to training relative to: 
(i) the nature of human trafficking; 
(ii) how human trafficking is defined pursuant to the federal Victims of Trafficking and 
Violence Protection Act of 2000; 
(iii) how to identify victims of human trafficking, as defined pursuant to the federal 
Victims of Trafficking and Violence Protection Act of 2000; 
(c) Every licensed innholder operating a qualified accommodation shall post in plain 
view, in the lobby and in any public restroom of such qualified accommodation, a written notice 
developed by the attorney general, which shall include the national human trafficking hotline 
telephone number. 
(d) The attorney general shall:  
(i) make available a list of approved human trafficking recognition training programs for 
use by a licensed innholder operating a qualified accommodation pursuant to this section;  
(ii) develop a standard written notice to be posted in every qualified accommodation 
pursuant to subsection (c). 
(e) The attorney general shall promulgate regulations necessary to implement this section.